Maryland, session 2026, HB0322.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Health – General
19–101.
In this subtitle, “Commission” means the Maryland Health Care Commission.
19–104.
(a) (1) The Commission shall consist of 15 members appointed by the Governor
with the advice and consent of the Senate.
(2) Of the 15 members:
(i) [Nine] EIGHT shall be individuals who do not have any
connection with the management or policy of a health care provider or payor; and
– 1 –

Ch. 38 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(ii) Of the remaining [six] SEVEN members:
1. Two shall be physicians;
2. Two shall be payors, as defined in § 19–132 of this subtitle;
3. ONE SHALL BE A REPRESENTATIVE AN
ADMINISTRATOR OF A HOSPITAL, AS DEFINED IN § 19–301 OF THIS TITLE;
4. One shall be a nursing home administrator in the State;
and
[4.] 5. One shall be a nonphysician health care practitioner.
(b) (1) The term of a member is 4 years.
(2) The terms of members are staggered as required by the terms provided
for members of the Commission on October 1, 1999.
(3) At the end of a term, a member continues to serve until a successor is
appointed and qualifies.
(4) A member who is appointed after a term has begun serves only for the
rest of the term and until a successor is appointed and qualifies.
(5) The Governor may remove a member for neglect of duty, incompetence,
or misconduct.
(6) A member may not serve more than two consecutive terms.
(c) When appointing members to the Commission, the Governor shall:
(1) Assure that:
(i) At least [five] FOUR members are residents of different counties
with a population of 300,000 or more; and
(ii) At least three members are residents of different counties with a
population of less than 300,000, of which at least:
1. One shall be a resident of the Eastern Shore;
2. One shall be a resident of Allegany County, Garrett
County, Washington County, Carroll County, or Frederick County; and
3. One shall be a resident of Southern Maryland; and
– 2 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 38
(2) To the extent practicable, assure geographic balance and promote
racial, ethnic, and gender diversity in the Commission’s membership.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2026.
Approved by the Governor, April 14, 2026.
– 3 –